Texas, session 892, HB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 34.002(b), Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The review committee is a multidisciplinary advisory committee within the department and is composed of the following 25 [23] members: (1)  23 [21] members appointed by the commissioner as follows: (A)  four physicians specializing in obstetrics, at least one of whom is a maternal fetal medicine specialist; (B)  one certified nurse-midwife; (C)  one registered nurse; (D)  one nurse specializing in labor and delivery; (E)  one physician specializing in family practice; (F)  one physician specializing in psychiatry; (G)  one physician specializing in pathology; (H)  one epidemiologist, biostatistician, or researcher of pregnancy-related deaths; (I)  one social worker or social service provider; (J)  two community members with experience in a relevant health care field, including a field involving the analysis of health care data, one of whom must represent an urban area of this state and one of whom must represent a rural area of this state; (K)  one medical examiner or coroner responsible for recording deaths; (L)  one physician specializing in critical care; (M)  one physician specializing in emergency care; (N)  one physician specializing in cardiology; (O)  one physician specializing in anesthesiology; (P)  one physician specializing in oncology; [and] (Q)  one representative of a managed care organization; and (R)  two doulas, one of whom must have experience providing care in an urban community, one of whom must have experience providing care in a rural community, and at least one of whom must specialize in end-of-life care; (2)  a representative of the department's family and community health programs; and (3)  the state epidemiologist for the department or the epidemiologist's designee. SECTION 2.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the commissioner of state health services shall appoint members to the Texas Maternal Mortality and Morbidity Review Committee in accordance with Section 34.002, Health and Safety Code, as amended by this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.